Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1402
Grand jury; convening; no limitation on right to prosecute by information.

The convening of a grand jury shall in no way limit the right of prosecution on information or complaint during the time the grand jury is in session.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 393, p. 814;

R.S.1913, § 9032;

C.S.1922, § 10056;

C.S.1929, § 29-1402;

R.S.1943, § 29-1402;

Laws 1959, c. 118, § 3, p. 450.

This section does not allow the district court to enjoin a county attorney from proceeding with a separate preliminary hearing during the time that the grand jury is proceeding on the same matter. In re Grand Jury of Douglas Cty., 263 Neb. 981, 644 N.W.2d 858 (2002).